Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1314
Participant; failure to qualify; forfeiture.

Any participant in a service award benefit program who ceases to be a volunteer or participant and consequently fails to qualify for a service award benefit pursuant to section 35-1312 or 35-1313 shall forfeit all rights to any future distribution of any portion of the principal amount of any contributions made to an annual account for any service year in which such participant was on the certification list and any income derived from such contributions.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 14.